Massachusetts, session 194th, S1456.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 15 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby by amended by striking section 15 in its entirety and replacing it with
the following new section 15:-
Section 15. The selectmen or council of each of the several towns shall, upon receipt of
the recommendation that a regional school district should be formed and of a proposed
agreement therefor submitted in accordance with the provisions of sections fourteen to fourteen
B, inclusive, or otherwise in the form and with the approval required by said sections, cause to be
presented the question of accepting the provisions of sections sixteen to sixteen I, inclusive, and
the proposed agreement or agreements. Said question shall be determined, in a town having an
open town meeting, by vote with printed ballots at an annual or special town meeting to be held
in either case within thirty days after receipt of such recommendation by the selectmen or at an
annual or special town election to be held in either case not less than thirty-five nor more than
of 2

fifty days after receipt of such recommendation. and, in a town having a representative town
meeting or council, at an annual or special town election to be held in either case not less than
thirty-five nor more than fifty days after receipt of such recommendation. The article in the
warrant for such annual or special town meeting or election and the question on the printed
ballots to be used at such meeting or election shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the town accept the provisions of sections sixteen to sixteen I, inclusive, of chapter
seventy-one of the General Laws providing for the establishment of a regional school district,
together with the towns of , and , etc., and for construction, maintenance and operation of a
regional school by said district in accordance with the provisions of a proposed agreement filed
with the selectmen?
If a majority of the voters present and voting on said question in each of the several
towns shall vote in the affirmative, said sections sixteen to sixteen I, inclusive, shall become
effective, and the proposed regional school district shall be deemed to be established forthwith in
accordance with the terms of the agreement so adopted notwithstanding any defect or omission
in the creation or organization of any regional school district planning committee or regional
school district planning board.
of 2